Hawaii, session 2025, SB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 342F-30.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e) For the purposes of this section: "Leaf blower" means any machine used to blow leaves, dirt, or other debris off sidewalks, driveways, lawns, and other surfaces. "Residential zone" includes residential districts, apartment districts, and business mixed use districts, as those terms may be used in state law or county ordinance. "State holiday" means any day established as a state holiday in section 8-1. "Weed whacker" means a gasoline or electric powered yard tool that uses either a flexible monofilament line (also known as a string or line trimmer) or revolving metal cutting blade intended to cut or trim grass and other vegetation." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________